Utah statutes.
46-1-16.   Official signature -- Official seal -- Seal impression.
(1)  In completing a notarial act, a notary shall sign on the notarial
certificate exactly and only the name indicated on the notary's commission.
(2) (a)  A notary shall keep an official notarial seal that is the exclusive
property of the notary and that may not be used by any other person.
(b)  Upon the resignation, revocation, or expiration of a notarial commission,
the seal shall be destroyed.
(c)  Each notarial seal obtained by a notary on or after July 1, 2003 shall
use purple ink.
(3) (a)  A new seal shall be obtained for any new commission or recommission.
(b)  A new seal shall be obtained if the notary changes the notary's name of
record at any time during the notary's commission.
(c)  The seal impression shall be affixed near the notary's official signature
on a notarial certificate and shall include a sharp, legible, and
photographically reproducible ink impression of the notarial seal that
consists of:
(i)  the notary public's name exactly as indicated on the notary's commission;
(ii)  the words "notary public," "state of Utah," and "my commission expires
on (commission expiration date)";
(iii)  for a notary seal issued on or after July 1, 2008, the notary's
commission number, exactly as indicated on the notary's commission;
(iv)  a facsimile of the great seal of the state; and
(v)  a rectangular border no larger than one inch by two and one-half inches
surrounding the required words and seal.
(4)  An embossed seal impression that is not photographically reproducible may
be used in addition to, but not in place of, the photographically reproducible
seal required in this section.
(5)  The notarial seal shall be affixed in a manner that does not obscure or
render illegible any information or signatures contained in the document or in
the notarial certificate.
(6)  A notary acknowledgment on an annexation, subdivision, or other map or
plat is considered complete without the imprint of the notary's official seal
if:
(a)  the notary signs the acknowledgment in permanent ink; and
(b)  the following appear below or immediately adjacent to the notary's
signature:
(i)  the notary's full name and commission number appears exactly as indicated
on the notary's commission;
(ii)  the words "A notary public commissioned in Utah"; and
(iii)  the expiration date of the notary's commission.
(7)  A notary acknowledgment on an electronic message or document is
considered complete without the imprint of the notary's seal if the following
information appears electronically within the message:
(a)  the notary's full name and commission number appearing exactly as
indicated on the notary's commission; and
(b)  the words "notary public," "state of Utah," and "my commission expires
on______ (date)".
